fi: Tuorejuuston muoto: Pala/harkko; Dippi; Annosneliöt; Jauhe; Viipaleet; Tanko; Rasia/levite; Tuubi; Vaahdotettu; Muu
el: Μορφή τυριού κρέμα: Μπλοκ/τούβλο; Ντιπ; Τετράγωνα μερίδας; Σκόνη; Φέτες; Στικ; Κεσεδάκι/άλειμμα; Σωληνάριο; Χτυπημένο; Άλλο
hu: Krémsajt formája: Tömb/tégla; Mártogatós; Kockaadagok; Por; Szeletelt; Rúd; Tégelyes/kenhető; Tubusos; Habosított; Egyéb
it: Forma della crema di formaggio: Panetto; Salsa dip; Formaggini a porzione; Polvere; Fette; Bastoncino; Vaschetta/spalmabile; Tubo; Montato; Altro
da: Flødeostform: Blok; Dip; Portionsfirkanter; Pulver; Skiver; Stang; Bæger/smøreost; Tube; Pisket; Andet
fr: Moule à fromage à la crème: Bloc/brique; Trempette; Portions carrées; Poudre; Tranches; Bâtonnet; Barquette/à tartiner; Tube; Fouetté; Autre
nb: Format for kremost: Blokk; Dip; Porsjonsfirkanter; Pulver; Skiver; Stang; Beger/smørbart; Tube; Pisket; Annet
ru: Форма сливочного сыра: Блок/брикет; Дип; Порционные квадраты; Порошок; Ломтики; Стик; Контейнер/спред; Тюбик; Взбитый; Другое
de: Frischkäseform: Block; Dip; Portionsquadrate; Pulver; Scheiben; Rolle; Becher/Aufstrich; Tube; Aufgeschlagen; Andere
sv: Form för färskost: Block; Dipp; Portionsrutor; Pulver; Skivor; Stång; Ask/bredbar; Tub; Vispad; Övrigt
cs: Forma na smetanový sýr: Blok/cihla; Dip; Porcované kostky; Prášek; Plátky; Tyčinka; Vanička / k namazání; Tuba; Šlehaný; Ostatní
ro-RO: Forma brânzei cremă: Bloc/cărămidă; Dip; Porții pătrate; Pudră; Felii; Baton; Cutie/cremă tartinabilă; Tub; Aerată; Altele
tr: Krem peynir biçimi: Blok/kalıp; Dip sos; Porsiyon kareler; Toz; Dilimlenmiş; Çubuk; Kutu/sürülebilir; Tüp; Çırpılmış; Diğer
hr-HR: Oblik krem sira: Blok/kocka; Umak; Porcijske kockice; Prah; Listići; Štapić; Posudica/namaz; Tuba; Tučeno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Forma smotanového syra: Blok/tehla; Dip; Porciované štvorčeky; Prášok; Plátky; Tyčinka; Téglik/nátierka; Tuba; Šľahané; Iné
nl: Roomkaastextuur: Blok; Dip; Portieblokjes; Poeder; Plakjes; Stick; Kuipje/smeerkaas; Tube; Opgeklopt; Overige
pt-BR: Forma de cream cheese: Bloco/tablete; Molho (dip); Porções em quadrados; Em pó; Fatias; Palito; Pote/creme; Tubo; Aerado; Outros
es: Fórmula de queso crema: Bloque/barra; Dip; Cuadrados en porciones; Polvo; Rebanadas; Barra; Tarrina/para untar; Tubo; Batido; Otro
zh-CN: 奶油奶酪形态: 块状/砖形; 蘸料; 小方块装; 粉状; 片装; 棒状; 桶装/涂抹酱; 软管装; 搅打发泡; 其他
en: Cream cheese form: Block/brick; Dip; Portion squares; Powder; Slices; Stick; Tub/spread; Tube; Whipped; Other
bg-BG: Форма на крема сиренето: Блок/тухличка; Дип; Квадратчета на порции; Прах; Слайсове; Блокче; Кутия/за мазане; Туба; Разбито; Други
ko: 크림치즈 형태: 블록/브릭; 딥; 1인분 사각형; 분말; 슬라이스; 스틱; 터브/스프레드; 튜브; 휘핑; 기타
th: รูปแบบของครีมชีส: บล็อก/ก้อน; ดิป; แบ่งชิ้นสี่เหลี่ยม; ผง; แผ่น; แท่ง; กระปุก/สเปรด; หลอด; วิป; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Tepamojo sūrio forma: Blokelis / plytelė; Padažas (dip); Porcijiniai kvadratėliai; Milteliai; Griežinėliai; Lazdelė; Indelis / tepamas; Tūbelė; Plaktas; Kita
pl: Forma twarożku: W kostce / bloczek; Dip; Kwadraty porcjowane; W proszku; W plastrach; Paluszki; W pudełku / do smarowania; W tubce; Puszysty (ubijany); Inna
pt-PT: Forma do queijo creme: Bloco/tijolo; Molho; Quadrados de porção; Pó; Fatias; Barra; Embalagem/para barrar; Tubo; Batido; Outro
vi: Dạng phô mai kem: Khối/bánh; Nước chấm; Khối vuông chia sẵn; Bột; Lát; Dạng que; Hộp/đồ phết; Tuýp; Đánh bông; Khác
sl-SI: Oblika kremnega sira: Blok/kocka; Pomaka; Porcijski kvadratki; Prah; Rezine; Zavitek; Lonček/namaz; Tuba; Stepano; Drugo
zh-TW: 奶油起司形態: 塊狀/磚狀; 沾醬; 方形小包裝; 粉末; 切片; 條狀; 桶裝/塗抹醬; 管裝; 攪打; 其他
ja: クリームチーズフォーム: ブロック / ブリック; ディップ; ポーションスクエア; パウダー; スライス; スティック; カップ / スプレッド; チューブ; ホイップ; その他